Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-372
Revenue administration; implementation of programs; records; statistical information.

The Department of Revenue shall develop, operate, and implement systems for the production of records of taxes and other revenue and receipts collected by any agency of the State of Nebraska. Such records shall provide for the collection and recording of such accounting information in such fashion as may be required by the accounting division of the Department of Administrative Services and shall provide in addition for such further statistical information as the Department of Revenue may find necessary for the effective execution of its responsibilities under appropriate laws of this state.

Laws 1965, c. 459, § 4, p. 1456;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 77-323;

Laws 1980, LB 834, § 13.